Utah statutes.
53-6-108.   Donations, contributions, grants, gifts, bequests, devises, or endowments -- Authority to accept -- Disposition.

(1)  The division may accept any donations, contributions, grants, gifts, bequests, devises, or endowments of money or property, which shall be the property of the state.

(2) (a)  If the donor directs that the money or property be used in a specified manner, then the division shall use it in accordance with these directions and state law.

(b)  All money and the proceeds from donated property not disposed of under Subsection (2)(a) shall be deposited in the General Fund as restricted revenue for the division.

